Nevada, session 83, SB290.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 277A.260 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
277A.260 1. A commission may:
(a) Provide for and maintain such security in operations as is
necessary for the protection of persons and property under its
jurisdiction and control [.] , including, without limitation,
authorizing any designated security personnel employed by the
commission to remove from a vehicle or other property of the
commission any person who is engaged in conduct which
constitutes a violation of the provisions of NRS 203.100.
(b) Employ professional, technical, clerical and other personnel
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(c) Establish fines for a passenger who refuses to:
(1) Pay or otherwise fails to pay the proper fare to ride on the
public transit system established and operated by the commission; or
(2) Comply with a regional or statewide health and safety
standard or mandate.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
 If the commission establishes such fines, the commission may
establish procedures that provide for the issuance and collection of
the fines.
2. The commission or any person who contracts with the
commission to operate the public transit system shall:
(a) Maintain, in accordance with all applicable provisions of
state and federal law, any audio or video recording that:
(1) Is used as evidence in a disciplinary action involving an
employee of any person who contracts with the commission to
operate the public transit system; or
(2) Contains an incident on the public transit system that
results in an injury to an employee of a person who contracts with
the commission to operate the public transit system.
(b) Upon the request of an employee organization that is the
exclusive bargaining agent of the employees of a person who
contracts with the commission to operate the public transit system,
provide the employee organization with any audio or video
recording that:
(1) Is used as evidence in a disciplinary action involving an
employee of any person who contracts with the commission to
operate the public transit system; or
(2) Contains an incident on the public transit system that
results in an injury to an employee of a person who contracts with
the commission to operate the public transit system, provided that
the commission and the person who contracts with the commission
to operate the public transit system receive a written request by the
employee organization for the audio or video recording within 10
calendar days of the incident.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)